Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 4. Tax Appeals.

Sec. 43.05.400.
Office of tax appeals established. [Repealed, § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 43.05.405.
Jurisdiction.

The office has original jurisdiction to hear formal appeals from informal conference decisions of the Department of Revenue under AS

43.05.240

. Appeal to the office may be taken only from an informal conference decision under AS

43.05.240

. AS

44.64.060

does not apply to an administrative hearing under the jurisdiction of the office under this section. Jurisdiction of the office under this section is limited to, and AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

and AS

44.64.070

apply to and govern, an administrative appeal regarding

electric and telephone cooperative taxes under AS 10.25;

a seafood marketing assessment under AS 16.51;

all taxes levied under AS 43, except the property tax assessed under AS 43.56; and

any other taxes administered by the Department of Revenue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 66 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.05.410.
Appointment; term; reappointment. [Repealed, § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 43.05.415.
Removal. [Repealed, § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 43.05.420.
Administration.

[Repealed, § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004.]

In addition to qualifications under AS

44.64.040

, an administrative law judge who conducts a proceeding under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

shall have at least four years of professional experience as a tax attorney, a certified public accountant practicing in the area of tax, or a tax administrator.

The chief administrative law judge may adopt regulations implementing or interpreting AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

, including rules of procedure and evidence for proceedings before the office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am §§ 67, 68, 91 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.05.425.
Qualifications; code of conduct. [Repealed, § 91 ch 163 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 43.05.430.
Notice of appeal from informal conference decision.

An appeal under the jurisdiction of the office is initiated by filing with the office, and serving upon the commissioner of revenue, a notice of appeal from an informal conference decision of the Department of Revenue under AS

43.05.240

. A notice of appeal from the informal conference decision may be filed or amended after the time for filing has expired only if good cause is shown.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For hearing procedures, see 2 AAC 64, art. 2.

Sec. 43.05.435.
Scope and standards for decision.

The administrative law judge shall hear all questions de novo under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

. The administrative law judge shall

resolve a question of fact by a preponderance of the evidence or, if a different standard of proof has been set by law for a particular question, by that standard of proof;

resolve a question of law in the exercise of the independent judgment of the administrative law judge;

defer to the Department of Revenue as to a matter for which discretion is legally vested in the Department of Revenue, unless not supported by a reasonable basis.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 69 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.05.440.
Service of documents.

Service of documents required under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

may be accomplished in any manner authorized under the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. If service is done only by mail, the date of service is determined by the date of mailing. If service is done by both mail and hand delivery, the date of service is determined by the earlier of the date of mailing or actual receipt of the documents.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 170 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.05.445.
Discovery.

In an appeal under AS

43.05.405

, discovery may take place only under a plan for discovery approved by the administrative law judge. The administrative law judge shall approve a plan for discovery to the extent consistent with the efficient, just, and speedy conduct of the appeal. The plan may limit or set conditions on discovery and must include provisions for stipulations of fact by the Department of Revenue and the taxpayer. Discovery shall be limited to information that is relevant to the determination of the correct tax or penalty, unless the Department of Revenue or the taxpayer makes a showing that the discovery is reasonably calculated to lead to admissible information.

Requests by the taxpayer for disclosure of public records relating to the appeal are governed by, and the records are disclosed only in accordance with, the plan approved under this section.

Legislative history, reported court decisions, statutes, regulations, or similar documents available for public inspection at a library or the office of the lieutenant governor or through a publicly accessible database must be obtained through those means and may not be sought through discovery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Sec. 43.05.450.
Subpoenas.

An administrative law judge may issue a subpoena to compel attendance of a witness or the production of a document or thing. A subpoena may compel attendance of a witness or production of a document or thing, located either inside or outside the state, to the maximum extent permitted by law. A subpoena may be used for the purpose of discovery or for the purpose of presenting evidence at a formal hearing. A subpoena shall issue upon request of a party, subject to reasonable limitation or conditions set in the subpoena. A subpoena may be enforced by petition to or other appropriate legal proceeding brought in a court of this state or another jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Sec. 43.05.455.
Formal hearing.

At or before the formal hearing, a party may present argument and evidence relevant to the amount of the tax or penalty. The administrative law judge shall administer oaths and permit inquiry necessary to determine the proper amount of the tax or penalty.

Each party and witness shall be present during the formal hearing, except that

with the consent of the taxpayer, the administrative law judge may conduct all or part of the hearing by telephone, audio or video teleconference, or other electronic medium; and

with the consent of the parties and the administrative law judge, all or part of the hearing may be conducted through correspondence.

The taxpayer bears the burden of proof on questions of fact by a preponderance of the evidence unless a different standard of proof has been set by law for a particular question.

The formal hearing before the administrative law judge is not required to be conducted with strict adherence to the Alaska Rules of Evidence. Relevant evidence must be admitted if it is probative of a material fact in controversy. Irrelevant and unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded. Hearsay evidence is admissible if it is the kind of evidence on which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious affairs, regardless of the existence of a common law or statutory rule that makes improper the admission of the evidence over objection in a civil action. Oral evidence may be taken only on oath or affirmation. The rules of privilege are effective to the same extent that they are recognized in a civil action in the courts of this state, except that relevant documents and other material items that are public records under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

shall be admissible.

The administrative law judge shall make a record of the proceedings of the appeal, including recordation of the proceedings of a formal hearing by electronic or stenographic means.

The administrative law judge may grant exceptions to the requirements of this section in the interest of justice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 24 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Sec. 43.05.460.
Enforcement.

The administrative law judge and each party is responsible for the efficient, just, and speedy conduct of the formal hearing. The administrative law judge may impose sanctions on the parties for failure to comply with a subpoena, an order respecting discovery, and any other matter regarding conduct of the appeal. In imposing sanctions, the administrative law judge shall be guided by the practices of the courts of this state in imposing sanctions for similar offenses in civil proceedings.

The administrative law judge may

remand the matter for consideration of material new information or material information withheld by a party;

prohibit a party from introducing information previously withheld without good cause, and any other evidence dependent upon the information;

enter an order, upon a showing of good cause,

barring a designated claim or defense;

striking part or all of a pleading of a party; or

dismissing part or all of the appeal; or

grant any other relief that the administrative law judge considers appropriate.

In addition to the remedies of (a) and (b) of this section, a party may seek enforcement of a subpoena or other order of an administrative law judge by the superior court under AS

44.62.590

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Sec. 43.05.465.
Decision; reconsideration; finality.

Within 180 days after the record on the appeal is closed, the administrative law judge shall issue a decision in writing. The decision must contain a concise statement of reasons for the decision, including findings of fact and conclusions of law. In the decision, the administrative law judge may grant relief, provide remedies, and issue any order that is appropriate. The administrative law judge shall serve each party in the case with a copy of the decision. Unless reconsideration is ordered under (c) of this section, the decision under this subsection is the final administrative decision.

A party may request reconsideration of a decision issued under (a) of this section within 30 days after the date of service shown in the certificate of service of the decision. The request must state specific grounds for reconsideration. Reconsideration may be granted if, in reaching the decision, the administrative law judge has

overlooked, misapplied, or failed to consider a statute, regulation, court or administrative decision, or legal principle directly controlling;

overlooked or misconceived some material fact or proposition of law;

misconceived a material question in the case; or

applied law in the ruling that has subsequently changed.

The administrative law judge may issue an order for reconsideration of all or part of the decision upon request of a party. Reconsideration is based on the record, unless the administrative law judge allows additional evidence and argument. A hearing on reconsideration at which additional evidence or argument is offered or received is subject to the procedures applicable to a hearing under AS

43.05.455

.

The power to order reconsideration expires 60 days after the date of service, as shown on the certificate of service, of a decision issued under (a) of this section. If the administrative law judge does not issue an order for reconsideration within the time allowed for ordering reconsideration, a motion for reconsideration is considered denied.

Within 60 days after the close of the record on reconsideration, the administrative law judge shall issue a written decision upon reconsideration. The administrative law judge shall serve each party in the case with a copy of the decision upon reconsideration. The decision upon reconsideration is the final administrative decision.

A final administrative decision becomes final either on the date

60 days after the date of service of a decision issued under (a) of this section if an order for reconsideration is not issued; or

the decision upon reconsideration is served, as shown by the certificate of service executed by the administrative law judge under (e) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996)

Sec. 43.05.470.
Public proceedings and records.

Records, proceedings, and decisions under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

are confidential, except that the records, proceedings, and decisions become public records and open to the public when the final administrative decision is issued and becomes final.

Upon a showing of good cause, an administrative law judge shall issue a protective order requiring that specified parts of the records, proceeding, or decision shall be kept confidential in a particular appeal. If a protective order is issued, the final administrative decision shall be made public after redacting by deletion or substitution of information as required by the protective order.

The department, in consultation with the chief administrative law judge, shall maintain, index, and make available for public inspection the final administrative decisions, proceedings, and records of the office made public under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 71 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.05.475.
Consistency of decisions.

As to questions of law, a final administrative decision issued under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

, unless reversed or overruled, has the force of legal precedent.

To promote consistency among legal determinations issued under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

, the chief administrative law judge may review and circulate among the other administrative law judges the drafts of formal decisions, decisions upon reconsideration, and other legal opinions of the other administrative law judges in the office. The drafts are confidential documents and are not subject to disclosure under AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.295

or this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 72 ch 163 SLA 2004; am § 25 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.100

—

40.25.220

” was substituted for “AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS

09.25.100

—

09.25.220

.

Sec. 43.05.480.
Judicial review.

Judicial review by the superior court of a final administrative decision may be had by a party to the appeal under AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

by filing a notice of appeal in accordance with the applicable rules of court governing appeals to that court in civil matters. The notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days after an administrative decision becomes final under AS

43.05.465

. The right to judicial review under this subsection is not affected by the failure to seek reconsideration before the administrative law judge.

The amount due must be paid or refunded within 30 days after the date that the final administrative decision becomes final under AS

43.05.465

. In place of payment of the amount due, a taxpayer who has appealed a final administrative decision may file a bond with the court or otherwise obtain relief from payment in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Appeals under this section are reviewed under AS

44.62.560

and

44.62.570

.

If, after the appeal is heard, it appears that the final administrative decision was correct, the court shall affirm the decision. If the final administrative decision is incorrect, the court shall determine the amount due. If the taxpayer is entitled to a refund, the court shall order the repayment and the Department of Revenue shall pay the amount due and attach a certified copy of the judgment to the payment. If the court determines that the taxpayer owes an additional amount, the court shall order the payment and the taxpayer shall pay the amount due and attach a certified copy of the judgment to the payment. Any payment required under this subsection shall be paid by the 30th day following the expiration of the time within which an appeal from the superior court decision may be filed, unless the party appealing files a bond or otherwise obtains relief from payment in accordance with the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 73 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Sec. 43.05.499.
Definitions.

In AS

43.05.405

—

43.05.499

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“administrative law judge” means an administrative law judge employed or retained by the office;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“discovery” means the use of subpoenas, subpoenas duces tecum, interrogatories, requests for production, requests for admission, depositions, and other methods of civil procedure by which one party to an action may discover information within the knowledge and control of another person;

“legislative history” means the documents of the legislature recording the background and events, including draft bills, correspondence and memoranda, committee reports, tapes and transcripts of hearings, and tapes and transcripts of floor debate concerning consideration of a bill;

“office” means office of administrative hearings (AS 44.64);

“party” means the Department of Revenue or the taxpayer;

“proceeding” means only a proceeding under the jurisdiction of the office;

“subpoena” means a command to appear at a certain time and place to testify, or to appear at a certain time and place to produce books, papers, and other things, and testify;

“tax” means a tax described in AS

43.05.405

, including a seafood marketing assessment under AS 16.51;

“taxpayer” means a person required to pay a tax, including a person required to pay a seafood marketing assessment under AS 16.51.

History.

(§ 1 ch 108 SLA 1996; am § 74 ch 163 SLA 2004)